Utah statutes.
57-21-14.   Effect of federal action.
The commencement of an action in a federal court of competent jurisdiction for
relief under federal law based upon any act prohibited by this chapter bars
the commencement or continuation of any adjudicative proceeding before the
division or state court proceeding in connection with the same claims under
this chapter.
